Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-280
Intercept, defined.

Intercept means the aural or other acquisition of the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication through the use of any electronic, mechanical, or other device.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 142.